Nevada, session 83, SB434.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 439A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 18, inclusive,
of this act.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 3 to 7, inclusive, of this act have the meanings ascribed
to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. “Account” means the Statewide Health Care Access
and Recruitment Program Account created by section 8 of this act.
Sec. 4. “Certified area of need” means a critical shortage of
providers of health care who practice a health care profession or
specialty, a critical shortage of providers of health care in a
geographic area of this State or a critical shortage of clinical
services or expertise in this State or a geographic area of this
State, as identified by the assessment conducted pursuant to
section 9 of this act.
Sec. 5. “Funding agreement” means a funding agreement
between the Department and a grantee entered into pursuant to
section 14 of this act.
Sec. 6. “Medical facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.0151.
Sec. 7. “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 629.031.
-
*SB434_R2*

– 4 –
Sec. 8. 1. There is hereby created in the State General
Fund the Statewide Health Care Access and Recruitment Program
Account. The Department shall administer the Account.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 4 and 5,
commencing with the fiscal year that begins on July 1, 2027, each
year after the close of the previous fiscal year and before the
issuance of the State Controller’s annual report, the State
Controller shall transfer from the State General Fund to the
Account 0.5 percent of the total anticipated revenue for the fiscal
year in which the transfer will be made, as projected by the
Economic Forum for that fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (e) of
subsection 1 of NRS 353.228 and as adjusted by any legislation
enacted by the Legislature that affects state revenue for that fiscal
year.
3. Money transferred pursuant to subsection 2 to the Account
is a continuing appropriation solely for the purpose of authorizing
the use of the transferred money for the purposes set forth in this
section.
4. If the balance in the Account is greater than $60,000,000
on July 1 of a fiscal year, the State Controller shall not make a
transfer pursuant to subsection 2 for that fiscal year or any
subsequent fiscal year until the balance in the Account decreases
to an amount less than $30,000,000.
5. If the balance in the Account to Stabilize the Operation of
the State Government created by NRS 353.288 is less than $1
billion on July 1 of a fiscal year, the State Controller shall not
make a transfer pursuant to subsection 2 for that fiscal year.
6. To the extent that money is available from rebates received
by this State for prescription drugs, the Director may, not later
than June 30 of each fiscal year, request the approval of the
Interim Finance Committee for a transfer of not more than
$25,000,000 of that money to the Account for that fiscal year.
7. The Account consists of:
(a) Money transferred to the Account pursuant to
subsection 2;
(b) Any money transferred to the Account pursuant to
subsection 6;
(c) Any money appropriated by the Legislature;
(d) Any money received through gifts, grants and donations
pursuant to subsection 11; and
(e) Any money provided by any other source to carry out the
provisions of sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this act.
8. Any interest earned on money in the Account, after
deducting any applicable charges, must be credited to the Account.
Money that remains in the Account at the end of a fiscal year does
-
*SB434_R2*

– 5 –
not revert to the State General Fund, and the balance in the
Account must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
9. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 10, money in
the Account must be used to carry out the provisions of sections 2
to 18, inclusive, of this act. The Department may use not more
than 1 percent of the money in the Account to pay the
administrative costs necessary to carry out those provisions.
10. With the approval of the Interim Finance Committee, the
Director may transfer money from the Account to another account
for the purpose of obtaining additional federal financial
participation under Medicaid.
11. The Department may accept gifts, grants and donations to
carry out the provisions of sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this act.
The Director shall deposit such gifts, grants and donations into
the Account.
Sec. 9. 1. On or before July 1 of each even-numbered year,
the Department shall:
(a) Conduct a comprehensive assessment of the health care
needs in this State; and
(b) Compile a report of the results of the assessment and
submit the report to the Governor and the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Health and Human Services and the next
regular session of the Legislature.
2. The assessment conducted pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 must consist of:
(a) A quantitative analysis of the health care workforce in this
State, including, without limitation:
(1) A determination of the total number of providers of
health care in this State and the total number of providers of
health care in this State who practice different professions and
different specialties within those professions;
(2) A determination of the total number of providers of
health care who practice in different geographic areas of this State
and the total number of providers of health care who practice
different professions and different specialties within those
geographic areas; and
(3) A comparison of the numbers of providers of health
care identified pursuant to subparagraphs (1) and (2) with
benchmarks established by the Health Resources and Services
Administration of the United States Department of Health and
Human Services or nationally recognized organizations that
prescribe such benchmarks;
(b) A determination of the most critical shortages in the health
care workforce of this State, prioritizing:
-
*SB434_R2*

– 6 –
(1) Essential health care professions and specialties and
essential clinical services or expertise currently experiencing
shortages; and
(2) Geographic areas of this State that are experiencing the
most critical shortages of providers of health care or clinical
services or expertise; and
(c) An identification of unmet needs for specific health
technology and therapies, including, without limitation, genomic
testing, clinical trials, cellular therapies and palliative care.
3. The report compiled pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 1 must include, without limitation:
(a) A summary of the assessment conducted pursuant to
subsection 1, including, without limitation:
(1) An analysis of shortages of providers of health care,
shortages of clinical services or expertise and unmet health needs
in this State; and
(2) A description of shortages of providers of health care
and the shortages of clinical services or expertise by geographic
region, including rural and urban areas;
(b) A prioritized list of recommendations for allocating
funding pursuant to sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this act in a
manner that addresses the critical shortages and unmet needs
identified in the assessment conducted pursuant to subsection 1;
(c) Recommendations for legislation and regulatory changes
to improve the recruitment and retention of providers of health
care; and
(d) An analysis of the effects of projects funded pursuant to
sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this act on the health care workforce
and health needs of this State.
4. As used in this section, “palliative care” means a
multidisciplinary and patient- and family-centered approach to
specialized medical care for a person with a serious illness, which
approach focuses on the care of a patient throughout the
continuum of an illness and involves addressing the physical,
emotional, social and spiritual needs of the patient, as well as
facilitating patient autonomy, access to information and choice of
care. The term includes, without limitation, discussion of the goals
of the patient for treatment and discussion of treatment options
appropriate to the patient, including, where appropriate, hospice
care and comprehensive management of pain and symptoms.
Sec. 10. 1. The Department shall, in accordance with
sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this act, establish and administer the
Statewide Health Care Access and Recruitment Grant Program as
a competitive program to award grants of money from the Account
to entities described in subsection 2 seeking to address shortages
-
*SB434_R2*

– 7 –
of providers of health care or clinical services or expertise and
difficulties in accessing health care identified in the assessment
conducted pursuant to section 9 of this act. The Department may
adopt any regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of
sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this act.
2. The following entities are eligible to apply for a grant from
the Account:
(a) Entities that provide health care or coordinate or otherwise
facilitate the provision of health care, including, without
limitation:
(1) Medical facilities and community health clinics;
(2) Group practices of providers of health care;
(3) Federally-qualified health centers, as defined in 42
U.S.C. § 1396d(l)(2)(B):
(4) Accredited institutions of higher education that offer
programs to train providers of health care, including, without
limitation, residency and fellowship programs for providers of
health care;
(5) Entities that provide behavioral health care;
(6) Facilities for the treatment of alcohol or other
substance use disorders, as defined in NRS 449.00455;
(7) Detoxification facilities or programs certified pursuant
to NRS 458.025;
(8) Substance use disorder prevention coalitions certified
pursuant to NRS 458.033; and
(9) Oncology organizations, including, without limitation,
oncology organizations that:
(I) Offer programs for transplantation and cellular
therapy;
(II) Provide or facilitate the provision of clinical trials;
(III) Host fellowships in oncology and oncology
subspecialties; or
(IV) Have been designated as a comprehensive cancer
center by the National Cancer Institute, or its successor
organization;
(b) Governmental entities; and
(c) Nonprofit organizations that provide direct care to patients,
training for providers of health care or services aimed at
expanding access to health care.
3. To be eligible for a grant from the Account, a proposed
project must:
(a) Be designed to increase the number of providers of health
care, improve the expertise of providers of health care or improve
access to clinical services or innovative treatments.
(b) Directly address one or more certified areas of need.
-
*SB434_R2*

– 8 –
(c) Include specific, measurable outcomes to demonstrate an
increase in the number of providers of health care, improved
access to health care and the enhanced capacity of the health care
work force in a manner that addresses the certified areas of need
identified in paragraph (b).
(d) Secure from the Federal Government or any other source,
or receive from the Federal Government or any other source a
commitment to provide, an amount of matching funds and in-kind
contributions for which the total value is at least equal to the
amount of the grant for which the applicant is applying. Matching
funds from the Federal Government meet the requirements of this
section only if the applicant demonstrates that the project qualifies
for and is likely to receive such federal money. In-kind
contributions may consist of, without limitation:
(1) Construction or procurement of machinery or
infrastructure;
(2) Recruitment of providers of health care;
(3) The provision of free health care;
(4) Charitable contributions after the completion of the
project; and
(5) Unfunded research.
(e) Demonstrate the potential for financial and operational
sustainability after the expiration of the grant, including, without
limitation, through:
(1) Plans for continued staffing, budget sustainability and
continued allocation of resources; and
(2) An impact assessment concerning the potential long-
term effects of the project on survival, quality of life and the
experience of patients.
Sec. 11. An entity described in subsection 2 of section 10 of
this act that wishes to receive a grant from the Account to support
a project described in subsection 3 of section 10 of this act must
apply to the Department in the form prescribed by the Department
during an open application period established by the Department.
The application must include, without limitation:
1. A comprehensive proposal for the project to be funded by
the grant that outlines:
(a) The goals and objectives of the proposed project;
(b) The specific certified areas of need that the proposed
project will address; and
(c) Detailed plans to recruit, retain or train providers of health
care.
2. A detailed budget that clearly sets forth the projected costs
and sources of funding for the proposed project and the manner in
which that funding will be used to pay those projected costs. Such
-
*SB434_R2*

– 9 –
sources of funding must include, without limitation, the matching
funds and in-kind contributions described in paragraph (d) of
subsection 3 of section 10 of this act, where applicable.
3. Evidence of approval or commitment from the persons and
entities that will provide the matching funds or in-kind
contributions described in paragraph (d) of subsection 3 of section
10 of this act or otherwise contribute to or collaborate on the
project.
4. Documentation of the qualifications and relevant
experience of the applicant, including, without limitation:
(a) A demonstrated ability to produce measurable, long-term
improvements in rates of survival, quality of life and the
experience of patients; and
(b) The experience and organizational capacity necessary to
implement and sustain the project successfully.
5. Identification of the key personnel who will be involved in
the project and any relevant partnerships with persons and entities
engaged in the provision of health care, educational institutions,
governmental entities or other persons and entities.
6. A timeline for implementing the proposed project that
includes, without limitation, defined milestones, measurable
performance indicators and a plan for reporting progress and
evaluating outcomes at regular intervals.
7. A detailed operational plan for the proposed project that:
(a) Outlines staffing, facilities, equipment and other logistical
requirements; and
(b) Addresses potential challenges in recruiting and retaining
providers of health care.
8. A plan for sustainability that addresses the manner in
which the proposed project will continue to provide benefits after
the expiration of the grant, including, without limitation, possible
sources of funding, partnerships or strategies for reinvestment.
9. Any additional information required by regulation of the
Department for:
(a) Assessing the feasibility, impact and sustainability of
projects and the alignment of projects with the objectives set forth
in subsection 3 of section 10 of this act; or
(b) Ensuring accountability and preventing the misuse of
funds.
Sec. 12. 1. The Department shall review applications
submitted pursuant to section 11 of this act to determine which
applicants will be recommended to receive funding pursuant to
section 13 of this act.
2. In reviewing applications and determining which
applicants to recommend for funding, the Department shall:
-
*SB434_R2*

– 10 –
(a) Give first priority for recommendation to projects that will
most effectively address unmet needs;
(b) Give secondary priority for recommendation to projects
that will provide the greatest benefit in certified areas of need;
(c) Give tertiary priority for recommendation to projects that
will be located in:
(1) Areas designated by the Health Resources and Services
Administration of the United States Department of Health and
Human Services as having a shortage of providers of health care,
including, without limitation:
(I) Areas designated as medically underserved areas or
health professional shortage areas with high scores;
(II) Areas designated as health professional shortage
areas for primary care; and
(III) Areas with populations that have been designated
as medically underserved populations; or
(2) Geographic areas where at least 30 percent of the
population is enrolled in Medicaid, as determined by the
Department or the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of
the United States Department of Health and Human Services; and
(d) To the extent practicable, make recommendations to fund
projects in different geographic areas of this State.
3. The Department shall consider the following criteria when
reviewing applications pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) The severity and urgency of the shortage of providers of
health care in the certified areas of need targeted by the proposed
project;
(b) The potential of the proposed project to produce
measurable, long-term improvements in rates of survival, quality
of life and the experience of patients, including, without
limitation, by causing high levels of improvement for underserved
populations;
(c) The potential of the proposed project to create lasting
improvement in accessibility to health care and the availability of
providers of health care in the community affected by the proposed
project, including, without limitation, by meeting specific metrics
for improvements to access to health care, health care outcomes
and the capacity of the health care workforce;
(d) The extent of the proposed investment in and establishment
of capital infrastructure to address certified areas of need over the
long term and support sustainable access to health care,
including, without limitation:
(1) The construction of medical facilities and other health
care facilities;
-
*SB434_R2*

– 11 –
(2) The acquisition of medical equipment or equipment
related to the advancement of medical research;
(3) The expansion of capabilities for delivering services
through precision medicine, early-phase clinical trials and
telehealth; and
(4) The development of facilities for residencies or other
training of providers of health care;
(e) The level of financial commitment from sources other than
the State, including, without limitation, the degree to which the
matching funds and in-kind contributions exceed the amount
required by paragraph (d) of subsection 3 of section 10 of this act;
(f) The level of collaboration between the applicant and other
entities in the public and private sectors to enhance the overall
impact of the project;
(g) The qualifications and organizational capacity of the
applicant to effectively implement and sustain the proposed
project, including, without limitation, a demonstrated ability to
manage similar projects, meet projections concerning outcomes
and maintain compliance with the requirements of sections 2 to
18, inclusive, of this act and any regulations adopted pursuant
thereto; and
(h) The degree to which the proposed project will strategically
use technology or innovative models of delivering health care in a
manner that may reduce costs, improve outcomes and expand
access to underserved populations.
4. As used in this section, “telehealth” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 629.515.
Sec. 13. 1. After reviewing applications pursuant to section
12 of this act, the Department shall submit to the Interim Finance
Committee recommendations for the awarding of grants from the
Account for the approval of the Committee.
2. When making recommendations pursuant to subsection 1,
the Department:
(a) Shall ensure that all applicants for grants from the
Account meet the requirements of section 10 of this act;
(b) May recommend funding one or more proposed projects,
within the limits of money in the Account;
(c) Shall, to the extent that qualified applicants are available,
recommend awarding all of the money in the Account for a fiscal
year as grants; and
(d) May not recommend awarding a total amount of money
during any funding period that exceeds the amount available in
the Account for that funding period.
3. The Department shall maintain a public record of all
decisions to recommend the award of funding to an entity that
-
*SB434_R2*

– 12 –
submits an application pursuant to section 11 of this act or to
refuse to make such a recommendation.
4. Upon receiving approval of a recommendation from the
Interim Finance Committee pursuant to subsection 1, the
Department shall issue a written notice of the approval to
the applicant to whom the recommendation pertains. Such written
notice must include, without limitation:
(a) The total amount of money being awarded; and
(b) The schedule of disbursements and specific conditions that
will be included in the applicable funding agreement.
Sec. 14. 1. Not later than 30 days after the Interim Finance
Committee approves a grantee to receive funding pursuant to
section 13 of this act, the Department shall enter into a funding
agreement with the grantee. Such a funding agreement must
outline the terms and conditions of the grant and the
responsibilities of the grantee in a manner that ensures that the
grantee satisfies the requirements and objectives specified in
subsection 3 of section 10 of this act.
2. A funding agreement entered into pursuant to subsection 1
must:
(a) Provide for the disbursement of the grant in installments
that are contingent on the achievement of specific milestones,
goals and indicators of performance relating to increases in the
number of providers of health care, improved access to health care
and improvements to infrastructure;
(b) Require the grantee to submit documentation that the
grantee has achieved the milestones, goals and indicators of
performance prescribed in the agreement pursuant to paragraph
(a) before money may be disbursed, including, without limitation:
(1) Financial reports detailing expenditures of money and
allocations of matching funds;
(2) Operational progress reports that demonstrate
measurable achievements in recruiting providers of health care,
improving health care infrastructure or expanding the availability
of health care or clinical services; and
(3) Any additional information required by the Department
for the purposes specified in this paragraph;
(c) Require the grantee to submit to the Department an annual
report that includes, without limitation, details regarding the
financial status of the project, efforts to recruit providers of health
care and the impact of the project;
(d) Require the grantee to comply with any request made by
the Department or the Office of Finance in accordance with
section 16 of this act;
-
*SB434_R2*

– 13 –
(e) Specify the date on which the portion of the project funded
by the grant is scheduled to terminate; and
(f) Require the grantee to meet any additional conditions
imposed by the Department to ensure accountability, the
achievement of the objectives of the project and the sustainability
of the project.
3. A funding agreement entered into pursuant to subsection 1
may require that the matching funds be:
(a) Held in escrow by an independent third party before the
disbursement of money from the Account;
(b) Secured through an irrevocable trust, letter of credit or
surety bond; or
(c) Verified through financial reporting to confirm the
availability and appropriate use of the matching funds.
4. A funding agreement entered into pursuant to subsection 1
may require that the matching funds and in-kind contributions be
subject to an independent verification process that may include,
without limitation:
(a) Certification by a certified public accountant or other
qualified third party;
(b) Submission of documentation demonstrating the value and
availability of matching funds or in-kind contributions, including,
without limitation:
(1) Financial statements;
(2) Governance documents;
(3) Appraisals or market valuations of in-kind
contributions; and
(4) Documentation of cost basis or fair market value, as
appropriate;
(c) Periodic reports concerning the valuation of in-kind
contributions that are aligned with the disbursement schedule
established pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 2; and
(d) Adherence to generally accepted accounting principles for
the valuation of in-kind contributions.
Sec. 15. 1. If a grantee significantly modifies a project that
has received funding pursuant to sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this
act, or if there are changes in the availability of funding for such a
project, the grantee shall immediately notify the Department and
submit to the Department a revised plan for the project. Upon
receiving such notification, the Department may, to ensure that
money from the Account is used efficiently and effectively in a
manner that complies with section 10 of this act, adjust the terms
of the funding agreement, including, without limitation, the terms
for disbursement and the amount of funding, or suspend or
terminate the funding agreement.
-
*SB434_R2*

– 14 –
2. If a grantee terminates a project that has received funding
pursuant to sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this act, before the date
of termination specified in the applicable funding agreement or if
such a project remains inactive for 12 consecutive months, the
grantee shall:
(a) Notify the Department; and
(b) Submit to the Department a revised plan for the project.
3. Upon receiving notice pursuant to subsection 2 of the early
termination or inactivity of a project, the Department may:
(a) Place a lien or other security interest on assets related to
the project until at least half of the goals and indicators of
performance included in the applicable funding agreement are
met;
(b) Reallocate unspent money to other approved projects or
deposit unspent money in the Account to support grants for other
projects pursuant to sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this act;
(c) Require the grantee to take corrective action within 60
days;
(d) Suspend or terminate the grant;
(e) Require the grantee to repay money previously disbursed;
or
(f) Take any combination of the actions described in
paragraphs (a) to (e), inclusive.
4. Not later than 60 days after the early termination of a
project for which a grantee received a grant pursuant to sections 2
to 18, inclusive, of this act, a grantee shall submit to the
Department a report which includes, without limitation:
(a) The total amount of money spent on the project;
(b) The amount of money disbursed from the Account that was
spent on the project;
(c) The reasons for the early termination of the project; and
(d) A proposed plan to repay money disbursed from the
Account, if required by the Department.
Sec. 16. 1. The Department shall conduct site visits, audits
or reviews at least annually to ensure that a project funded
pursuant to sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this act comply with the
requirements of those sections and the applicable funding
agreement.
2. The Office of Finance may audit any project funded
pursuant to sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this act to ensure that the
grantee is using the money awarded pursuant to 2 to 18, inclusive,
of this act in an effective and efficient manner that accords with
state and federal law and the applicable funding agreement.
Sec. 17. If the Department concludes, as the result of a site
visit, audit or review pursuant to section 16 of this act or for any
-
*SB434_R2*

– 15 –
other reason, that a grantee who has received funding pursuant to
sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this act has failed to:
1. Comply with the terms of a funding agreement, including,
without limitation, by failing to achieve the milestones, goals and
indicators of performance prescribed in the agreement pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of section 14 of this act, the
Department may:
(a) Suspend or terminate the grant;
(b) Require the grantee to take corrective action within 60
days;
(c) Require the grantee to repay money that was previously
disbursed to the grantee;
(d) Reallocate unspent money to other approved projects or
deposit unspent money in the Account to support grants for other
projects pursuant to sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this act;
(e) Take such other measures as are necessary to ensure
compliance with the provisions of sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of
this act, the regulations adopted pursuant thereto, other state and
federal law and the applicable funding agreement; or
(f) Take any combination of the actions described in
paragraphs (a) to (e), inclusive.
2. Comply with any provision of sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of
this act, any regulation adopted pursuant thereto or any other
state or federal law, or has misused funds or submitted fraudulent
information to the Department, the Department:
(a) Shall suspend or terminate the grant;
(b) May refer the matter to a district attorney who has
jurisdiction over the matter or the Attorney General, where
appropriate; and
(c) May additionally take any other action or combination of
actions described in subsection 1.
Sec. 18. Upon completing a project for which a grantee
received a grant pursuant to sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this act,
and again 10 years after the completion of such a project, the
grantee shall submit to the Department a report that includes,
without limitation:
1. A summary of the achievements of the project relative to
the initial goals of the project, focusing on improvements in access
to health care or clinical services and the capacity of the health
care workforce in the area affected by the project;
2. Financial accounting of all money received for the project
pursuant to sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this act and from other
sources, including, without limitation, matching funds and an
itemized statement of expenditures of such money;
-
*SB434_R2*

– 16 –
3. A narrative evaluation of the impact of the project on the
community affected by the project, including, without limitation,
benefits realized, challenges encountered and lessons learned for
future projects;
4. Any relevant data on patient outcomes, measurements of
community health or the retention and expansion of the health
care workforce attributable to the project; and
5. Feedback or testimonials concerning the project from
beneficiaries, partners and other affected persons and entities.
Sec. 19. NRS 218E.405 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218E.405 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
the Interim Finance Committee may exercise the powers conferred
upon it by law only when the Legislature is not in a regular or
special session.
2. During a regular or special session, the Interim Finance
Committee may also perform the duties imposed on it by NRS
228.1111, subsection 5 of NRS 284.115, NRS 285.070, subsection 2
of NRS 321.335, NRS 322.007, subsection 2 of NRS 323.020,
NRS 323.050, subsection 1 of NRS 323.100, subsection 3 of NRS
341.126, NRS 341.142, paragraph (f) of subsection 1 of NRS
341.145, subsection 3 of NRS 349.073, NRS 353.220, 353.224,
353.2705 to 353.2771, inclusive, 353.288, 353.335, 353.3375,
353C.224, 353C.226, paragraph (b) of subsection 4 of NRS
407.0762, NRS 428.375, 433.732, 439.4905, 439.620, 439.630,
445B.830, subsection 1 of NRS 445C.320 and NRS 538.650 [.] and
sections 8 and 13 of this act. In performing those duties, the Senate
Standing Committee on Finance and the Assembly Standing
Committee on Ways and Means may meet separately and transmit
the results of their respective votes to the Chair of the Interim
Finance Committee to determine the action of the Interim Finance
Committee as a whole.
3. The Chair of the Interim Finance Committee may appoint a
subcommittee consisting of six members of the Committee to
review and make recommendations to the Committee on matters of
the State Public Works Division of the Department of
Administration that require prior approval of the Interim Finance
Committee pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 341.126, NRS 341.142
and paragraph (f) of subsection 1 of NRS 341.145. If the Chair
appoints such a subcommittee:
(a) The Chair shall designate one of the members of the
subcommittee to serve as the chair of the subcommittee;
(b) The subcommittee shall meet throughout the year at the
times and places specified by the call of the chair of the
subcommittee; and
-
*SB434_R2*

– 17 –
(c) The Director or the Director’s designee shall act as the
nonvoting recording secretary of the subcommittee.
Sec. 20. NRS 353.288 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.288 1. The Account to Stabilize the Operation of the
State Government is hereby created in the State General Fund.
Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and 4, each year after
the close of the previous fiscal year and before the issuance of the
State Controller’s annual report, the State Controller shall transfer
from the State General Fund to the Account to Stabilize the
Operation of the State Government:
(a) Forty percent of the unrestricted balance of the State General
Fund, as of the close of the previous fiscal year, which remains after
subtracting an amount equal to 7 percent of all appropriations made
from the State General Fund during that previous fiscal year for the
operation of all departments, institutions and agencies of State
Government and for the funding of schools; and
(b) Commencing with the fiscal year that begins on July 1, 2017
[, 1] :
(1) One-half of one percent of the total anticipated revenue
for the fiscal year in which the transfer will be made, as projected by
the Economic Forum for that fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (e) of
subsection 1 of NRS 353.228 and as adjusted by any legislation
enacted by the Legislature that affects state revenue for that fiscal
year [.] , under circumstances where the State Controller is
required to transfer money to the Statewide Health Care Access
and Recruitment Program Account created pursuant to section 8
of this act; or
(2) One percent of the total anticipated revenue for the
fiscal year in which the transfer will be made, as projected by the
Economic Forum for that fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (e) of
subsection 1 of NRS 353.228 and as adjusted by any legislation
enacted by the Legislature that affects state revenue for that fiscal
year, under circumstances where the State Controller is prohibited
from transferring money to the Statewide Health Care Access and
Recruitment Program Account created pursuant to section 8 of
this act.
2. Money transferred pursuant to subsection 1 to the Account
to Stabilize the Operation of the State Government is a continuing
appropriation solely for the purpose of authorizing the expenditure
of the transferred money for the purposes set forth in this section.
3. The balance in the Account to Stabilize the Operation of the
State Government must not exceed 26 percent of the total of all
appropriations from the State General Fund for the operation of all
departments, institutions and agencies of the State Government and
for the funding of schools and authorized expenditures from the
-
*SB434_R2*

– 18 –
State General Fund for the regulation of gaming for the fiscal year
in which that revenue will be transferred to the Account to Stabilize
the Operation of the State Government.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and NRS
353.2735, beginning with the fiscal year that begins on July 1, 2003,
the State Controller shall, at the end of each quarter of a fiscal year,
transfer from the State General Fund to the Disaster Relief Account
created pursuant to NRS 353.2735 an amount equal to not more than
10 percent of the aggregate balance in the Account to Stabilize the
Operation of the State Government during the previous quarter. The
State Controller shall not transfer more than $500,000 for any
quarter pursuant to this subsection.
5. The Director of the Office of Finance in the Office of the
Governor may submit a request to the State Board of Examiners to
transfer money from the Account to Stabilize the Operation of the
State Government to the State General Fund:
(a) If the total actual revenue of the State falls short by 5 percent
or more of the total anticipated revenue for the biennium in which
the transfer will be made, as determined by the Legislature, or the
Interim Finance Committee if the Legislature is not in session; or
(b) If the Legislature, or the Interim Finance Committee if the
Legislature is not in session, and the Governor declare that a fiscal
emergency exists.
6. The State Board of Examiners shall consider a request made
pursuant to subsection 5 and shall, if it finds that a transfer should
be made, recommend the amount of the transfer to the Interim
Finance Committee for its independent evaluation and action. The
Interim Finance Committee is not bound to follow the
recommendation of the State Board of Examiners.
7. If the Interim Finance Committee finds that a transfer
recommended by the State Board of Examiners should and may
lawfully be made, the Committee shall by resolution establish the
amount and direct the State Controller to transfer that amount to
the State General Fund. The State Controller shall thereupon make
the transfer.
8. In addition to the manner of allocation authorized pursuant
to subsections 5, 6 and 7, the money in the Account to Stabilize the
Operation of the State Government may be allocated directly by the
Legislature to be used for any other purpose.
Sec. 21. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 21.5. In lieu of conducting the assessment described in
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of section 9 of this act on or before
July 1, 2026, the Department of Health and Human Services shall:
-
*SB434_R2*

– 19 –
1. Review existing assessments of the health care needs of this
State that, to the extent available, carry out the purposes described in
subsection 2 of section 9 of this act; and
2. Utilize the assessments described in subsection 1 to:
(a) Create the summary described in paragraph (a) of subsection
3 of section 9 of this act; and
(b) Make the recommendations described in paragraphs (b) and
(c) of subsection 3 of section 9 of this act.
Sec. 22. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 23. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB434_R2*